Missouri, session 2026, SB1393.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.600, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 478.600,
to read as follows:
478.600. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the
eleventh judicial circuit. These judges shall sit in
divisions numbered one, two, three and four. Beginning on
January 1, 2007, there shall be six circuit judges in the
eleventh judicial circuit and these judges shall sit in
divisions numbered one, two, three, four, five, and seven.
The division five associate circuit judge position and the
division seven associate circuit judge position shall become
circuit judge positions beginning January 1, 2007, and shall
be numbered as divisions five and seven. Beginning on
January 1, 2029, there shall be eight circuit judges in the
eleventh judicial circuit. These judges shall sit in
divisions numbered one, two, three, four, five, seven,
seventeen, and eighteen.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected
in 1980. The circuit judge in division four shall be
elected in 1982. The circuit judge in division one shall be
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1393 2
elected in 1984. The circuit judge in division three shall
be elected in 1992. The circuit judges in divisions five
and seven shall be elected [for a six-year term] in 2006.
The circuit judges in divisions seventeen and eighteen shall
be elected in 2028.
3. Beginning January 1, 2007, the family court
commissioner positions in the eleventh judicial circuit
appointed under section 487.020 shall become associate
circuit judge positions in all respects and shall be
designated as divisions nine and ten respectively. These
positions may retain the duties and responsibilities with
regard to the family court. The associate circuit judges in
divisions nine and ten shall be elected in 2006 for full
four-year terms.
4. Beginning on January 1, 2007, the treatment court
commissioner position in the eleventh judicial circuit
appointed under section 478.003 shall become an associate
circuit judge position in all respects. Such associate
circuit judge shall be elected in 2006 for a full four-year
term. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be
included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional
associate circuit judgeships per county under section
478.320.
5. Beginning in fiscal year 2015, there shall be one
additional associate circuit judge position in the eleventh
judicial circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be
elected in 2016. This associate circuit judgeship shall not
be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional circuit judgeships per county under section
478.320. Beginning in fiscal year 2019, there shall be one
additional associate circuit judge position in the eleventh
judicial circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be

SB 1393 3
elected in 2020. This associate circuit judgeship shall not
be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional circuit judgeships per county under section
478.320.
6. There shall be one additional associate circuit
judge position in the eleventh judicial circuit. The
associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028. This
associate circuit judge shall not be included in the
statutory formula for authorizing additional associate
circuit judges per county as provided in section 478.320.
✓